Nebraska, session 109, LB353.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB353 LB353
2025 2025
Section 1. A labor organization representing public school
employees or employers of public school employees shall not, as part of
any membership contract entered into or renewed after the effective date
of this act, place any restriction on when a public school employee may
join or terminate membership in a labor organization.
Sec. 2. Section 79-873, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-873 An authorization for a deduction under section 79-872 shall
be in writing, and the form to authorize shall also include a notice to
the employee of his or her right to refuse authorization. The
authorization shall continue in force until revoked in writing by the
employee. The authorization may also authorize the professional or labor
organization to certify annually the amount to be deducted from each
employee's wages, and, except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this
act, such certification shall bind the employee, the school district, and
the organization.
Sec. 3. Original section 79-873, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-